Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 8 Joint Control by Sureties

18-8-1.
Agreement for joint deposits.

It is lawful for any party, of whom a bond, undertaking, or other obligation is required, to agree with his or her surety or sureties for the deposit of any or all money and assets for which he or she and his or her surety or sureties are or may be held responsible, with a bank, savings banks, safe deposit, or trust company, authorized by law to do business, or with any other depository approved by the court or a judge of the court, if the deposit is otherwise proper, for safekeeping the deposit, and in a manner that prevents the withdrawal of the money or assets or any part of them, without the written consent of the surety or sureties, or an order of court, or a judge of the court, made on a notice to the surety or sureties that the court or judge may direct; provided, that the agreement shall not in any manner release from or change the liability of the principal or sureties as established by the terms of the bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1347, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-8-1

.